Georgia, session 2025_26, SB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 15 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to miscellaneous provisions under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended
by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-324.8.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'home study student' means a student in grades
six through 12 who is in a home study program that meets the requirements of
subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-690.
(b) Each local school system that offers the PSAT/NMSQT, SAT, PreACT, or ACT or an
advanced placement exam to students enrolled in such local school system shall:
S. B. 63
- 1 -

SB 63/FA
(1) Make each such test or exam available to any home study student who resides in the
local school system; and
(2) Post on its public website notice of the date that each such test or exam will be
administered. Such notice shall include registration dates and procedures and shall state
that such test or exam is available for home study students who reside in the local school
system.
(c) No local school system that offers the PSAT/NMSQT, SAT, PreACT, or ACT or an
advanced placement exam to students enrolled in such local school system shall require
home study students to pay a fee not required of students enrolled in such local school
system or impose any requirement that conflicts with or is in addition to the requirements
of subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-690."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 63
- 2 -